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Inspection Procedure
6: Starting Impossible (Starter Operative but No Initial Combustion)
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COMMENT ON TROUBLE SYMPTOM
- Failure is possibly caused by failed ignition circuit, failed fuel feed or
other faults.
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PROBABLE CAUSE
- Failed idle speed control
- Throttle valve fouled around
- Failed immobilizer system
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| STEP 1: Check battery voltage.
- Measure battery voltage at cranking.
OK: 8 V or higher
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:
Go to STEP 2  .
NO:
Check battery (Refer to GROUP 54 -
Battery -
On-vehicle Service -
Battery
Test  ).
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| STEP 2: Check engine warning lamp for burnt out bulb.
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:
Go to Step 3  .
NO:
Check engine-A/T-ECU power supply, engine control relay and ignition switch IG1
system (Refer to Inspection Procedure 24  ).
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| STEP 3: MUT-II/III diagnosis code
Q: Diagnosis code set?
YES:
Inspection chart for diagnosis codes (Refer to  )
NO:
Go to Step 4  .
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| STEP 4: MUT-II/III actuator test
OK: Operating sound of fuel pump can be heard.
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:
Go to Step 5  .
NO:
Check fuel pump system (Refer to Inspection Procedure 24  )
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| STEP 5. Check timing belt for breakage.
OK: Camshaft rotates.
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:
Go to Step 6  .
NO:
Replace timing belt.
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| STEP 6. Check throttle body (throttle valve) contamination.
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:
Go to Step 7  .
NO:
Clean throttle body (throttle valve portion) (Refer to  ).
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| STEP 7: MUT-II/III data list
OK:
- OFF (Ignition switch: ON)
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:
Go to Step 9  .
NO:
Go to Step 8  .
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| STEP 8: Connector check: C-135 engine-A/T-ECU connector
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Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:
- Check intermediate connectors B-19, and repair
if necessary. If intermediate connectors are normal, check and repair harness between B-22 (terminal No.
9) inhibitor switch connector and C-135 (terminal No. 51) engine-A/T-ECU connector.
- Check output line for open/short circuit.
NO:
Repair.
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| STEP 9: MUT-II/III data list
- Refer to Data list reference table
.
- Item 22: Crank angle sensor
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:
Go to Step 10  .
NO:
Check crank angle sensor system (Refer to Code No. P0335  ).
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| STEP 10: Check injector for operating sound.
- Check injector for operating sound (Refer to
).
Q: Can operating sound be heard?
YES:
Go to Step 11  .
NO:
- Check the injector system of the defective
cylinder.
- (Refer to Code No. P0201: No. 1 injector system
.)
- (Refer to Code No. P0202: No. 2 injector system
.)
- (Refer to Code No. P0203: No. 3 injector system
.)
- (Refer to Code No. P0204: No. 4 injector system
.)
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| STEP 11: Check ignition coil spark.
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:
Go to Step 12  .
NO:
- Check ignition circuit system (Refer to Inspection Procedure
30)
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| STEP 12: Fuel pressure measurement.
- Fuel pressure measurement (Refer to
).
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:
Go to Step 13  .
NO:
Repair.
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| STEP 13: Replace engine-A/T-ECU
- After replacing the engine-A/T-ECU, re-check the trouble symptoms.
Q: Does trouble symptom persist?
YES:
Check for foreign matters (water, kerosene, etc.) in fuel and replace if necessary.
NO:
Check end.
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